apertium-wbp.wbp.twol
Alphabet
 A B Ç D E Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ü w y ý z
 %{A%}:a %>:0
 %{I%}:i %{I%}:u
 %{U%}:u %{U%}:i
 ! %{D%}:%- %{D%}:0
 %-
;

Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y Ý 
        a e ä i o ö u ü y ý ;

Rules 

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Replace i with u before ng"
%{I%}:u <=> _ ( %>: ) :n :g ; 

"Replace i with u before -ng"
%{I%}:u => _ ( %>: ) :- :n :g ;

"Replace i with u before -rnu"
%{I%}:u => _ ( %>: ) :- :r :n :u ;


"Replace u with i after i-k"
%{U%}:i <=> :i ( %>: ) ( %-: ) :k _ ; 

!"Replace u with i after i-k"
!%{U%}:i <=> :i ( %>: ) :k _ ; 
!!%{U%}:i <=> :i :%- :k _ ; 


! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
